Louisiana, session 2026, HB597.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 1-B(Heading) of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 13:41 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 1-B. JUDICIAL COMPENSATION COMMISSION
§41. Judicial compensation
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and subject
to an annual appropriation for such purposes, the actual salary of the Louisiana
Supreme Court, court of appeal, district court, city court, and parish court judges
shall be increased each year on July first by the average of a five year rolling index
of the Consumer Price Index determined by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
B. The rolling index shall be determined each year after February first and
shall include the Consumer Price Index for the five years previous to the year of the
pay raise.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-401 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 597
C. The calculation of the five year rolling average shall be made by the
Department of the Treasury.
D. The percentage increase for a particular year shall not exceed the five
year rolling average for percentage increases in average annual pay for full-time state
classified employees, as measured by the most recently available reported data of the
Department of Civil Service.
E. The salary increases authorized in Subsection A of this Section shall be
contingent upon approval prior to each July first by the Louisiana Supreme Court
and the Louisiana Judicial Budgetary Control Board, after each has made a
determination that the judiciary has sufficient funding for the increase. The raise due
for any particular year shall be suspended to the extent of insufficient available
funds.
Section 2. R.S. 13:42 through 50 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2028.